California, session 20252026, AB1590.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 53076 of the Education Code is amended to read:53076. For purposes of administering the program established by this chapter, the Superintendent shall do all of the following:(a) (1) Determine, in collaboration with the executive director of the state board, and make public on a preliminary basis at least 30 days before a regularly scheduled meeting of the state board, the allocation formula, specific funding amounts, the purposes for which grant funds may be used, allowable and nonallowable expenditures, and the number of grants to be awarded. The information specified in this subdivision shall also be provided in writing to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature, the Department of Finance, and the Governor within 30 days following final approval of the state board.(2) For purposes of allocations commencing no later than the 2027–28 fiscal year, and pursuant to the requirements of paragraph (1), the Superintendent shall determine, in consultation with the executive director of the state board, a revised allocation formula that ensures that all funds appropriated for purposes of this chapter in any given fiscal year are fully allocated to applicants in that fiscal year, consistent with the requirements of this chapter.(b) Distribute funding on a multiyear schedule, establish a process for monitoring the use of the funding, and, if necessary, cease distribution of funding and recover previously distributed funding in the case of a recipient’s failure to report the specified data to the Superintendent or comply with a grant prerequisite or minimum standard.(c) Annually review grant recipients’ expenditures on career technical education programs for purposes of determining if the grant recipients have met the dollar-for-dollar match requirement specified in subdivision (a) of Section 53071. If, pursuant to Section 53076.1, an auditor determines that a grant recipient failed to meet the matching funds requirement, the Superintendent shall reduce the following year’s grant allocation in an amount equal to the unmet portion of the match requirement, if applicable. The reduction shall not reduce the grant recipient’s match requirement for the year in which the Superintendent reduces the allocation. If a grant recipient with an audit finding pursuant to Section 53076.1 does not have an allocation in the subsequent year to reduce, the department shall require the recipient to return the unmatched funds identified in the audit finding.(d) Require grant recipients to submit program reports pursuant to paragraph (11) of subdivision (c) of Section 53071.(e) Manage the grant process, collect pertinent data, and undertake statewide program improvement activities.(f) Promote the success of K–12 career technical education programs through statewide activities to improve and administer the program, including by facilitating system, program, and data alignment at the state and regional levels, facilitating the development and delivery of professional development training modules, and supporting school districts in meeting their college indicator and career indicator targets.(g) Ensure that the department fulfills the reporting requirements in Section 53076.5.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________